District of Columbia statutes.
7-741.02

Smoking prohibitions; inspections.

The Department of Health is authorized to conduct inspections of all places of employment and public places to ensure that the activity of smoking in such places, which is hereby prohibited, is not taking place, except that:

(1)

Between April 4, 2006, and January 1, 2007, the smoking prohibition set forth in this section shall not apply to a brew pub, club, nightclub, or tavern as those entities are defined in § 25-101 or the bar and bar area of a restaurant. This exception shall not apply to an indoor restaurant table of a restaurant, as defined in § 25-101.

(2)

After January 1, 2007, the exception described in paragraph (1) of this section shall expire and smoking shall be prohibited in all places of employment and public places at all times.

(3)

The places described in this chapter shall be required to post signs pursuant to § 7-1704 and in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 17 of this title or any other District law.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4916
as added Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-90, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1087
Restrictions on tobacco smoking, see § 7-1701 et seq.
2001 Ed., § 7-742.